Florida, session 2026, SB930.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âFlorida Retirement 27 Savings Task Force Act.â 28 Section 2.âSection 445.15, Florida Statutes, is created to 29 read: 30 445.15âFlorida Retirement Savings Task Force.â 31 (1)âThere is created adjunct to the department the Florida 32 Retirement Savings Task Force, a task force as defined in s. 33 20.03(5). The department shall provide administrative, 34 technical, and staff support to the task force. The purpose of 35 the task force is to examine and develop recommendations to 36 expand access to retirement savings vehicles for private sector 37 employees who lack employer-sponsored retirement plans. 38 (2)âThe task force shall be composed of 15 members, as 39 follows: 40 (a)âAn actuarial or investment specialist well-versed in 41 long-term asset performance, appointed by the Governor. 42 (b)âA community advocate who represents a low-income or 43 underserved community, appointed by the Governor. 44 (c)âAn attorney or policy analyst well-versed in labor law, 45 pension regulation, or state legislative frameworks, appointed 46 by the Governor. 47 (d)âA representative from the American Association of 48 Retired Persons who may provide insight into senior financial 49 security and retirement readiness, appointed by the Governor. 50 (e)âA Florida resident who has demonstrated experience in 51 retirement planning or workforce financial education, appointed 52 by the Governor. 53 (f)âA current employee of the Department of Management 54 Services of the Division of Retirement, appointed by the 55 President of the Senate. 56 (g)âA representative from the public sector, appointed by 57 the President of the Senate. 58 (h)âA small business owner, appointed by the President of 59 the Senate. 60 (i)âA certified financial planner, appointed by the 61 President of the Senate. 62 (j)âA professor from a state university whose area of 63 academic research is labor economics, demography, or retirement 64 system design, appointed by the President of the Senate. 65 (k)âA current employee of the department, appointed by the 66 Speaker of the House of Representatives. 67 (l)âA representative from the private sector or a 68 nontraditional employment area, appointed by the Speaker of the 69 House of Representatives. 70 (m)âA representative from a large employer or an employer 71 association, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 72 Representatives. 73 (n)âA retirement policy analyst who is familiar with the 74 Florida Retirement System, appointed by the Speaker of the House 75 of Representatives. 76 (o)âA professor from a state university whose area of 77 academic research is labor economics, demography, or retirement 78 system design, appointed by the Speaker of the House of 79 Representatives. 80 (3)(a)âThe task force shall convene no later than 60 days 81 after the effective date of this act and shall meet quarterly 82 thereafter or upon the call of the chair. 83 (b)âAt its first meeting, the task force shall elect a 84 chair and a vice chair from among its members. 85 (c)âThe task force may meet using communications media 86 technology as defined in s. 120.54(5)(b)2. 87 (d)âMembers serve without compensation but are entitled to 88 reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses as provided in s. 89 112.061. 90 (4)âAt a minimum, the task force shall do all of the 91 following: 92 (a)âAssess current coverage gaps in this state in private 93 sector retirement. 94 (b)âReview existing state and national models for 95 retirement plans. 96 (c)âPropose policy, design, and implementation 97 recommendations. 98 (d)âIdentify regulatory, administrative, and financial 99 barriers to implementation. 100 (e)âEvaluate fiscal impacts and possible funding 101 mechanisms. 102 (5)âThe task force may receive confidential or exempt 103 information from state agencies, and the task force must 104 maintain the confidential and exempt nature of such information 105 to the extent allowed by law. 106 (6)(a)âNo later than December 1, 2026, the task force shall 107 submit an interim report to the Governor, the President of the 108 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives which 109 outlines the task forceâs initial findings. 110 (b)âNo later than June 1, 2027, the task force shall submit 111 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 112 the House of Representatives the final report that includes 113 actionable recommendations and proposed statutory language for 114 expanding access to retirement savings vehicles for private 115 sector employees who lack employer-sponsored retirement plans. 116 (7)âThis section expires July 1, 2028, unless reenacted by 117 the Legislature. 118 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.